Massachusetts, session 194th, H2607.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 18A of Chapter 126 of the Generals Laws is hereby amended by striking the
language thereof, and adding the following:-
Section 18A.An employee in a jail or house of correction of a county who, while in the
performance of duty, receives bodily injuries resulting from actions of patients or prisoners in
custody, and who as result of such injury is entitled to benefits under chapter one hundred and
fifty-two, shall be paid, in addition to the benefits of said chapter one hundred and fifty-two, the
difference between the weekly cash benefits to which entitled under said chapter one hundred
and fifty-two and his regular salary, without such absence being charged against available sick
leave credits, even if such absence may be for less than eight calendar days duration.
of 1